West Virginia, session 2026, HB4820.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. ACTIONS FOR INJURIES. §55-7-15. Aid to victim of an accident, emergency, or disaster, or non-emergent situation; immunity from civil liability, definitions. (a) A person, including, without limitation, trained, licensed, or certified professionals, or an entity who in good faith renders or provides emergency care, or assistance at the scene of an accident, emergency, or disaster or non-emergent situation, voluntarily and without remuneration, may not be liable for any civil damages as the result of any act or omission at the scene or during the non-emergent situation, in rendering, or providing emergency care or assistance.(b) For purposes of this section, the term "emergency" means any instance where a person suffers from a medical condition requiring immediate treatment due to natural causes, accident, or crime.(c) For purposes of this section, "disaster" has the same meaning as that term is defined in §15-5-2 of this code.